North Carolina statutes. Chapter 95. Department of Labor and Labor Regulations.
Article 12. Units of Government and Labor Unions, Trade Unions, and Labor Organizations, and Public Employee Strikes.

§ 95-97.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-217, s. 26, effective October 31, 1998.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Public Employee Labor Relations in the Southeast — An Historical Perspective,” see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 71 (1980).

For comment on public employee bargaining in North Carolina, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 214 (1980).

§ 95-98.
Contracts between units of government and labor unions, trade unions or labor organizations concerning public employees declared to be illegal.

Any agreement, or contract, between the governing authority of any city, town, county, or other municipality, or between any agency, unit, or instrumentality thereof, or between any agency, instrumentality, or institution of the State of North Carolina, and any labor union, trade union, or labor organization, as bargaining agent for any public employees of such city, town, county or other municipality, or agency or instrumentality of government, is hereby declared to be against the public policy of the State, illegal, unlawful, void and of no effect.

History.

1959, c. 742.

Legal Periodicals.

For note discussing judicial deference to the administrative discretion of prison officials in the context of Jones v. North Carolina Prisoners’ Labor Unions, Inc., 433 U.S. 119, 97 S. Ct. 2532, 53 L. Ed. 2d 629 (1977), see 14 Wake Forest L. Rev. 647 (1978).

For article, “Public Employee Labor Relations in the Southeast — An Historical Perspective,” see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 71 (1980).

For article, “The Southern Public Employee Unions’ Constitutional Card: Utilization of the Equal Protection Clause,” see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 85 (1980).

For comment on public employee bargaining in North Carolina, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 214 (1980).

For survey of developments in North Carolina law, see 71 N.C.L. Rev. 1893 (1993).

For article, “Trademarks as Entrepreneurial Change Agents for Legal Reform,” see 95 N.C.L. Rev. 1519 (2017).

§ 95-98.1.
Strikes by public employees prohibited.

Strikes by public employees are hereby declared illegal and against the public policy of this State. No person holding a position either full- or part-time by appointment or employment with the State of North Carolina or in any county, city, town or other political subdivision of the State of North Carolina, or in any agency of any of them, shall willfully participate in a strike by public employees.

History.

1981, c. 958, s. 1.

§ 95-98.2.
Strike defined.

The word “strike” as used herein shall mean a cessation or deliberate slowing down of work by a combination of persons as a means of enforcing compliance with a demand upon the employer, but shall not include protected activity under Article 16 of this Chapter: Provided, however, that nothing herein shall limit or impair the right of any public employee to express or communicate a complaint or opinion on any matter related to the conditions of public employment so long as the same is not designed to and does not interfere with the full, faithful, and proper performance of the duties of employment.

History.

1981, c. 958, s. 1.

§ 95-99.
Penalty for violation of Article.

Any violation of the provisions of this Article is hereby declared to be a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1959, c. 742; 1993, c. 539, s. 667; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on public employee bargaining in North Carolina, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 214 (1980).

§ 95-100.
No provisions of Article 10 of Chapter 95 applicable to units of government or their employees.

The provisions of Article 10 of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes shall not apply to the State of North Carolina or any agency, institution, or instrumentality thereof or the employees of same nor shall the provisions of Article 10 of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes apply to any public employees or any employees of any town, city, county or other municipality or the agencies or instrumentalities thereof, nor shall said Article apply to employees of the State or any agencies, instrumentalities or institutions thereof or to any public employees whatsoever.

History.

1959, c. 742.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on public employee bargaining in North Carolina, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 214 (1980).